Hawaii statutes.
[§329-43.6] Overdose prevention;
limited immunity. (a) As used in this section:

"Drug or alcohol overdose" means:

(1) A condition, including but not limited to extreme
physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression,
coma, mania, or death, that is the result of consumption or use of a controlled
substance or alcohol or a substance with which the controlled substance or
alcohol was combined; or

(2) A condition that a layperson would reasonably
believe to be a drug or alcohol overdose that requires medical assistance.

"Seeks medical assistance" or
"seeking medical assistance" includes but is not limited to reporting
a drug or alcohol overdose to law enforcement, the 911 system, a poison control
center, or a medical provider; assisting someone so reporting; or providing
care to someone who is experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose while awaiting
the arrival of medical assistance.

(b) A person or persons who, in good faith,
seek medical assistance for someone who is experiencing a drug or alcohol
overdose and a person experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose who seeks medical
assistance for the person's self or is the subject of such a good faith request
shall not be arrested, charged, prosecuted, or convicted; have their property
subject to civil forfeiture; or otherwise be penalized for:

(1) Possession of a controlled substance or drug
paraphernalia under this chapter or part IV of chapter 712;

(2) Committing a prohibited act under section
281-101.5 or 712-1250.5;

(3) Violation of a restraining order; or

(4) Violation of probation or parole;

if the evidence for the arrest, charge, prosecution,
conviction, seizure, or penalty was gained as a result of the seeking of
medical assistance.

(c) The act of seeking medical assistance for
someone who is experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose shall be considered by
the court as a mitigating factor in any controlled substance or alcohol-related
criminal prosecution for which immunity is not provided by this section. [L
2015, c 217, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next